Washington statutes.
RCW 5.28.050

Form of affirmation.

Any person who has conscientious scruples against taking an oath, may make his or her solemn affirmation, by assenting, when addressed, in the following manner: "You do solemnly affirm that," etc., as in RCW 5.28.020.

[ 2011 c 336 s 135; 2 H. C. s 1697; 1869 p 379 s 5; RRS s 1268.]